District of Columbia statutes.
26-1212

Insurance.

Following an acquisition pursuant to this chapter, the deposits of any resulting association doing business in the District shall be insured by either the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation pursuant to 12 U.S.C. § 1811 et seq., or the Federal Savings and Loan Insurance Corporation pursuant to 12 U.S.C. § 1724 et seq. [repealed].

History

Oct. 12, 1988, D.C. Law 7-175, § 13, 35 DCR 6133

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 26-912.

References in Text

“ 12 U.S.C. § 1724 et seq.”, referred to in this section, was repealed by Pub. L. 101-73, title IV, § 407, August 9, 1989, 103 Stat. 363.

The “Federal Savings and Loan Insurance Corporation”, referred to in this section, has been abolished. For provisions relating to the abolition of the Federal Savings and Loan Insurance Corporation and the transfer of functions, personnel and property of that agency, see §§ 401 to 406 of Pub. L. 101-73, set out as a note under 12 U.S.C. § 1437.